Utah statutes.
51-2a-401.   Withholding allocated state funds from an entity that does not comply with the accounting report requirements.

(1)  The state auditor shall withhold allocated state funds sufficient to pay the cost of the accounting report from any political subdivision, interlocal organization, or other local entity that does not comply with the accounting report requirements of Section 51-2a-201.

(2) (a)  If no allocated state funds are available for withholding, the local entity shall reimburse the state auditor for any cost incurred in completing the accounting reports required under Section 51-2a-402.

(b)  The state auditor shall release the withheld funds when the accounting report requirements are met either voluntarily or by action under Section 51-2a-402.



Enacted by Chapter 206, 2004 General Session

